Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.170

Information—Availability to public—Exceptions.

(1) All information collected, assembled, or maintained by the director under this chapter is public information and is available for the examination of the public as provided by chapter 42.56 RCW except the following:

(a) Information obtained in private investigations pursuant to RCW 21.30.100 or 21.30.110;

(b) Information exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW; and

(c) Information obtained from federal or state agencies which may not be disclosed under federal or state law.

(2) The director in the director's discretion may disclose any information made confidential under subsection (1)(a) of this section to persons identified in RCW 21.30.180.

(3) No provision of this chapter either creates or derogates from any privilege which exists at common law, by statute, or otherwise when any documentary or other evidence is sought under subpoena directed to the director or any employee of the director.

[ 2005 c 274 s 239; 1986 c 14 s 18.]